Hawaii statutes.
[§188-31.5] Aquarium fish for export;
monthly count. The department of land and natural resources shall adopt
rules in accordance with chapter 91 to monitor the aquarium fish catch report
and fish dealer's report for export of aquarium fish taken from the waters of
the State for aquarium purposes pursuant to section 188-31. A monthly count of
the quantities taken of each individual species of aquarium fish exported shall
be reported to the board. [L 1989, c 319, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next